Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 5
CONFLICTS OF INTEREST, PENALTIES,
REMOVAL, SUSPENSION, ENFORCEMENT

11-102-501. Banking interests of officers and employees - violation.

No officer or employee of the division shall be an officer, director, attorney, owner, or shareholder in any bank, or, except as provided in this article 102, receive, directly or indirectly, any payment or gratuity from any such bank, or be indebted to any bank or other institution over which the division has supervisory control. Willful violation of this section is declared to be a criminal offense. This section does not prohibit being a depositor or the lessee of a safe deposit box on the same terms as are available to the public generally, or being indebted to a bank: Upon a mortgage loan upon the mortgagor's own home, or upon an installment debt transferred to a bank in the regular course of business by a seller of consumer goods including automobiles purchased by the officer or employee. Further, this section does not prohibit the five banker members of the banking board, provided for in section 11-102-103 (1)(a), from being executive officers in banks and from receiving bona fide compensation as such officers.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1076, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 92, § 126, effective February 25.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-115 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-102-502. Exemption from liability - when.

No member of the banking board or officer or employee of the division shall be liable in any civil action for damages for any act done or omitted in good faith in performing the functions of his or her office.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1076, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-116 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-102-503. Assessment of civil money penalties by banking board.

After notice and a hearing as provided in article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., and after making a determination that no other appropriate governmental agency has taken similar action against such person for the same act or practice, the banking board may assess against and collect a civil penalty from:
(1) (a) (I) After notice and a hearing as provided in article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., and after making a determination that no other appropriate governmental agency has taken similar action against such person for the same act or practice, the banking board may assess against and collect a civil penalty from:

Any person who has violated any final cease-and-desist order issued by the banking board pursuant to section 11-102-104 (7); and

Any state bank that, or any executive officer, director, employee, agent, or other person participating in the conduct of the affairs of such bank who, violates or knowingly permits any person to violate any of the provisions of this code or any rule promulgated pursuant to this code, or engages or participates in any unsafe or unsound practice in connection with a bank. The civil money penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars per day for each day such violation continues. This provision shall include, but not be limited to, the following violations: Making, or causing to be made, delinquent payment of assessments under section 11-102-401; submitting, or causing to be submitted, delinquent reports, including but not limited to call reports; or knowingly submitting, or causing to be submitted, to the banking board any report or statement that contains materially false or misleading information.

The banking board may, in extraordinary circumstances, at its option, and upon waiver of the right to a public hearing by a respondent, close to the public any hearing concerning an assessment of a civil money penalty, an order of suspension or removal from office, an order to cease and desist from any unlawful or unsafe and unsound practices, or any other formal enforcement action by the banking board. Such extraordinary circumstances occur when specific concern arises about prompt withdrawal of moneys from or the safety and soundness of the institution.

For the purposes of this section, a violation shall include, but is not limited to, any action, by any person alone or with another person, that causes, brings about, or results in the participation in, counseling of, or aiding or abetting of a violation.

Civil money penalties shall be assessed by written notice of assessment of a civil money penalty served upon the person to be assessed. The notice of assessment of a civil money penalty shall state the amount of the penalty, the period for payment, the legal authority for the assessment, and the matters of fact or law constituting the grounds for assessment. The notice of assessment of a civil money penalty shall constitute a final order for purposes of judicial review pursuant to section 24-4-106, C.R.S.

The banking board shall have authority to determine the amount of any civil money penalty assessed against any executive officer, director, employee, agent, or other person participating in the affairs of a bank, except as expressly limited by this code. In determining the amount of the civil money penalty to be assessed, the banking board shall consider the good faith of the person assessed, the gravity of the violation, any previous violations by the person assessed, the nature and extent of any past violations, and such other matters as the banking board may deem appropriate; except that the civil money penalty shall be not more than one thousand dollars per day for each day the person assessed remains in violation.

Civil money penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be due and payable and collected within thirty days after the notice of assessment of a civil money penalty is issued by the banking board; except that the banking board may, in its discretion, compromise, modify, or set aside any civil money penalty. Any civil money penalty collected pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the general fund.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1076, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-117 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-102-504. No indemnification or insurance against civil money penalties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no state bank shall indemnify or insure any executive officer, director, employee, agent, or person participating in the conduct of affairs of such bank against civil money penalties.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1078, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-118 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-102-505. Removal of director, officer, or other person.

The banking board may serve any executive officer, director, employee, agent, or other person participating in the conduct of the affairs of a bank with a written notice of its intention to remove such person from office whenever the banking board determines:

That any such person has committed any violation of this code, rule of the banking board, or cease-and-desist order of the banking board that has become final; has engaged or participated in any unsafe or unsound practice in connection with a bank; has committed or engaged in any act, omission, or practice that constitutes a breach of fiduciary duty to the state bank; or has been found liable for or guilty of any of the civil or criminal offenses enumerated in section 11-102-303 (8); and

That the state bank has suffered or probably will suffer substantial financial loss or other damage or that the interests of its depositors could be seriously prejudiced by reason of such violation, practice, breach of fiduciary duty, or offense; or

That such person has received financial gain by reason of such violation, practice, breach of fiduciary duty, offense; or

That such violation is one involving personal dishonesty on the part of such person or one that demonstrates a willful or continuing disregard for the safety or soundness of the state bank.

Whenever the banking board determines that an executive officer, director, employee, agent, or other person participating in the conduct of the affairs of a state bank, by conduct or practice with respect to another bank or business institution that results in substantial financial loss or other damage, has evidenced either personal dishonesty or a willful or continuing disregard for such state bank's safety and soundness, and, in addition, has evidenced unfitness to continue such person's relationship with the state bank, the banking board may serve upon such person a written notice of its intention to remove him or her from office or to prohibit the person's further participation in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of any Colorado state-chartered bank or trust company.

A notice of intention to remove a director, executive officer, or other person from office or to prohibit such person's participation in the conduct of the affairs of a state bank shall contain a statement of the facts constituting grounds therefor and shall fix a time and place at which a hearing shall be held thereon. Such hearing shall be fixed for a date not earlier than thirty days nor later than sixty days after the date of service of such notice, unless an earlier or a later date is set by the banking board at the request of such director or executive officer or other person, and for good cause shown. Unless such director, executive officer, or other person appears at the hearing in person or by a duly authorized representative, such person shall be deemed to have consented to the issuance of an order of removal or prohibition as specified in the notice issued pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section. In the event of such consent or, if, upon the record made at any such hearing, the banking board finds that any of the grounds specified in such notice have been established, the banking board may issue such orders of suspension or removal from office as it may deem appropriate. Any such order shall become effective at the expiration of thirty days after service upon such bank and the director, executive officer, or other person concerned except in the case of an order issued upon consent, which shall become effective at the time specified therein. Such order shall remain effective and enforceable except to such extent as it is stayed, modified, terminated, or set aside by action of the banking board or a reviewing court.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1078, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1477, § 39, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-119 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-102-506. Suspension of director, officer, or other person.

The banking board may suspend an executive officer, director, employee, agent, or other person participating in the conduct of the affairs of a state bank who becomes ineligible to hold such position, or who after receipt of an order of the banking board to cease and desist violates this code or a lawful rule or order issued pursuant thereto, or who is dishonest, or who is reckless or grossly incompetent in the conduct of banking business, or who may be subject to removal under section 11-102-505. It shall be a criminal offense for any such person, after receipt of a suspension order, to perform any duty or exercise any power of any state bank until the banking board vacates such suspension order. A suspension order shall specify the grounds thereof. A copy of the order shall be sent to the bank concerned and to each member of its board of directors.

With respect to any action pursuant to this section, ten days' notice, by certified mail, return receipt requested, and an opportunity for hearing shall be provided to the bank affected, in advance of any action taken by the banking board. In cases found by the banking board to involve extraordinary circumstances requiring immediate action, the banking board may take such action, without notice or hearing, but shall promptly afford a subsequent opportunity for hearing, upon application to rescind the action taken.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1079, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-120 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-102-507. Informal enforcement authority.

The banking board, or the commissioner if so authorized by the banking board, shall have authority to initiate informal actions to enforce the provisions of this code. In this regard the banking board or the commissioner may, in the banking board's or the commissioner's discretion, enter into written agreements such as a memorandum of understanding with, or an informal commitment letter from, or strongly worded letter of reprimand to any bank or any executive officer, director, employee, agent, or other person participating in the conduct of the affairs of a bank.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1079, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-121 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-102-508. Statements derogatory to state banks - penalty.

Any person who willfully makes, circulates, or transmits to another any false statement, written or oral, that is directly or by inference derogatory to the financial condition of any state bank and that results in an extraordinary withdrawal of funds from such bank or that results in impairing public confidence in such bank and any person who shall counsel, aid, procure, or induce another to start, transmit, or circulate any such statement knowing the statement to be false commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1079, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-2-122 as it existed prior to 2003.